src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgProxObj:ind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooyang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooying EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2PlObj:inagoogoban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2SgObj:inaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlProxObj:agwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgProxObj:agiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+1SgObj:i1yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlProxObj:egwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgProxObj:egiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+1SgObj:i1yamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlProxObj:adwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgProxObj:adiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+1SgObj:i1waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+2SgObj:inegwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+InclObj:inangwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+1SgObj:i1pan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2PlObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2SgObj:inegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+InclObj:inangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2SgObj:igooyaniban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlProxObj:angidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgProxObj:angidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlProxObj:angwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgProxObj:angiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+1SgObj:igooyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2SgObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgProxObj:indiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+InclObj:igooyangiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_C                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary
+VTA+Recip/di:0%>%>di VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Boundary ;
+VTA+Reflex/dizo:0%>%>dizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
0:%>%> VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_C                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_C                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_C_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VTA_Class=VTA_C_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_C, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Stems
aabin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aaboojiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aakwaadenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aandin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aanjishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aasamishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aawadoom VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aazhawagaakobizo' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
aazhigidin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
adaawam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
agindaaso' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
agwanjim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
akawaa' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
akwegi' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
andawewem VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
andoobiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
angwaganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
animisa' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
apiigishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ashidaabikishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
asigi' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ayabi' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
azhige' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
baakagwazhewebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
baapaashkojiiganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
baashkaakokondibeganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
baataan VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
babaamiba' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
babimoom VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
badakiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bagaskijiiganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bagitedaamikaneganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bagwaabikishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bakeba' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
banaadenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
basaganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bengwaabiganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
biichiwane' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
biijisa' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
biindigewebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
biiwiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bimose' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
bishkwaabam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
booboo' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
boozidinimaanganen VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
daashkin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
dakaashim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
dazhim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
dibaabiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
dipiiwin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gaagiimaa' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gaawam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gagiibishem VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gakakaagin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gawaakon VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gibishen VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gidoonewebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
giishkigwen VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
giiwitaayaabiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gikaawenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ginjiba' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
giziibiigidiyen VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gojimaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gopaji' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
gwayakogweshim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ikon VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
inagwanjim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ishkaabam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
izhijiin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
jiichiigwam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
maajiishkaa' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
maamooyawam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
maazhiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mamaazhiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mashkawaakon VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mazinweweganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
migoshkaadenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mikawi' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mino-dazhim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
mizhaganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
na'iigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
naanaagadawenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
naawaganaam VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
nabagishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
name' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
nandom:andom VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
neshangin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
niimin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
nimiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
nishkim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
nookaabiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
o'okoshim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ojaanimenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ombiwebin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ondaapi' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
onzaamashkina' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ozhaasham VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
waangoom VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
wanishkwem VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
wekwaayaakoshim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
wiijanokiim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
wiijibiim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
wiinaapagenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zaagaabiigishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zaamin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zagakin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zazaginiken VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zhaagoojiba' VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zheyaakoshim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zhingishim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
ziikoobiigin VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
zoongenim VTA_Class=VTA_C_Boundary ;
